Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 456.8 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Prohibiting


Corruption in the Legislature Act of 2026”.


B. No member of the Legislature may serve on any legislative


committee as a member, vice chair, or chair if such member has a


family member within the third degree of consanguinity that is an


employee of, appointee of, or contracted by this state or any


political subdivision of such that has any oversight, including



Req. No. 2542 Page 1


fiscal or legislative, over such entity for which the family member


is employed or contracted.


C. Any knowing violation of the provisions of subsection B of


this act shall be deemed corruption, and shall subject the member


who violates such provisions to removal of office.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2542 MSBB 1/14/2026 5:36:59 PM

































Req. No. 2542 Page 2